Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0823.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to regulate the business of carrying or transporting, buying, selling, or dealing in crude oil or petroleum or its products, or certain substances consisting primarily of carbon dioxide through pipe lines; pipelines; to authorize the use of public highways and the condemnation of private property; to regulate the purchase and storage of crude oil or petroleum or certain substances consisting primarily of carbon dioxide; to provide for the control and regulation of all corporations, associations, and persons engaged in such business; , by the Michigan public service commission; to define to provide for the powers and duties of the Michigan public service commission in relation thereto; and other state and local governmental officers and entities; to provide for the protection of public health and safety in relation to carbon dioxide pipelines; to impose fees; and to prescribe penalties. Sec. 1. (1) As used in this act: (a) "Carbon dioxide capture project" means that term as defined in section 5501 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5501. (b) "Carbon dioxide pipeline" means a pipeline carrying a carbon dioxide substance, including, but not limited to, a pipeline carrying a carbon dioxide substance from a carbon dioxide capture project to a carbon dioxide sequestration project. (c) "Carbon dioxide sequestration project" or "sequestration project" means that term as defined in sections 65101 and 65301 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.65101 and 324.65301. (d) (a) "Carbon dioxide substance" means a gaseous or liquid substance, consisting primarily of carbon dioxide, that will be put in storage, including, but not limited to, permanent sequestration or that has been or will be used to produce hydrocarbons in a secondary or enhanced recovery operation. (e) (b) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission. (f) "Department" means the department of emergency management and homeland security. (g) (c) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (2) A Except as authorized by and subject to this act, a person exercising or claiming the right to carry or transport crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances, by or through pipe line or lines, a pipeline for hire, compensation, or otherwise, or exercising or claiming the right to engage in the business of piping, transporting, or storing crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances, or engaging in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in crude oil or petroleum or carbon dioxide substances within this state, does not have or possess the any of the following: (a) The right to conduct or engage in the business or operations, in whole or in part. , or have or possess the (b) The right to locate, maintain, or operate the necessary pipe lines, pipelines, fixtures, and equipment belonging to, or used in connection with that business on, over, along, across, through, in or under any present or future highway, or part thereof, or elsewhere, within this state. , or have or possess the (c) The right of eminent domain. , or any (d) Any other right, concerning the business or operations, in whole or in part. , except as authorized by and subject to this act. (3) Subsection (2) does not apply to a right that exists on March 27, 1929 and is valid, vested, and incapable of revocation by any law of this state or of the United States. Sec. 3. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the commission is granted the power to control, investigate, and regulate a person doing any of the following: (a) Exercising or claiming the right to carry or transport crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances, by or through pipe line or lines, pipeline for hire, compensation, or otherwise within this state. (b) Exercising or claiming the right to engage in the business of piping, transporting, or storing crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances within this state. (c) Engaging in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in crude oil or petroleum or carbon dioxide substances within this state. (2) Producers The following are not subject to this act: (a) Producers or refiners of crude oil or petroleum or carbon dioxide substances or operators of private trunk or gathering lines or other methods of conveying those products, are not subject to this act if the nature and extent of their business is private and no public interest is involved in the conduct of the business. (b) A carbon dioxide capture project as defined in section 5501 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5501. (c) A carbon dioxide sequestration project as defined in sections 65101 and 65301 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.65101 and 324.65301. Sec. 11. (1) An emergency is hereby declared, by reason whereof it is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, safety, convenience and welfare that this act take immediate effect.A person shall not construct or operate a pipeline to transport crude oil or petroleum, or any of the products thereof, or carbon dioxide substances without the approval of the commission. (2) To obtain approval required under subsection (1), a person shall file with the commission an application that includes all of the following: (a) The overall purpose of the project and the needs that the project is intended to satisfy, including, but not limited to: (i) Public safety. (ii) Energy reliability. (iii) Market imbalances. (iv) Economic drivers. (v) Environmental stewardship. (b) Short- and long-term market conditions for the substance to be transported, such as energy conservation efforts, future supply and demand trends, and effects of governmental policy. (c) Anticipated benefits of the project to local, state, and regional residents. (d) An explanation of system-level alternatives that were considered to meet the needs identified pursuant to subdivision (a) and why they were not chosen. Alternatives may include, but are not limited to, the following: (i) No action. (ii) Utilizing available capacity in existing infrastructure. (iii) Upgrading or reconfiguring existing facilities or infrastructure. (e) An alternative route analysis that includes all of the following: (i) A description of leading alternative routes, including details relating to location, cost, and technology that would be employed for those routes. (ii) A comparative environmental impact analysis for major alternative routes, including, but not limited to, a map, a description of the habitats traversed, a description of the water bodies traversed, and proposed methods of installation for each route alternative. (f) An analysis of routing and construction, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Estimated construction costs of the project. (ii) Addresses for properties within 1.5 miles of the pipeline route and details on methods for mitigating inconveniences to homeowners and businesses caused by construction. (iii) Road crossing locations and construction. (iv) Identification of other underground facilities located within the proposed right-of-way. (v) Complete engineering specifications. (g) Complete operating specifications. (h) A statement from the applicant that the project will comply with all federal and state safety requirements. (i) An emergency response plan for the pipeline. (j) For a carbon dioxide pipeline, a risk-based assessment and a chemical safety contingency plan using modeling that takes into account all of the following: (i) Topography. (ii) Obstacles to carbon dioxide plume dispersal, such as vegetation and buildings. (iii) Weather conditions, including temperature, humidity, and wind direction and speed. (iv) Variations in the direction, concentration, and duration of a release of carbon dioxide. (v) Pipeline design, including, but not limited to, diameter, thickness, and shutoff valves. (k) A list of all required permits for the project, including the responsible agency and the application status. (l) An environmental impact review including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) An explanation of how the applicant will avoid, minimize, and mitigate any impairments to the environment. (ii) Documented threatened or endangered species habitats that are located within the proposed right-of-way or would otherwise be affected by construction. (iii) Areas where invasive species are present at proposed construction sites, and mitigation methods that will be used to minimize the spread of the invasive species. (iv) Historical or culturally sensitive areas within the proposed right-of-way. (v) Sensitive natural resources within the proposed right-of-way, including federally designated wild and scenic rivers, state or federally designated wilderness or environmental areas, and rare or unique ecological types. (vi) A revegetation and site restoration plan. (vii) Water body crossings, including wetland, river, stream, lake, and drain crossings, and the type of construction proposed for the crossings. (viii) A stormwater management plan and erosion control methods. (ix) Recreation sites within the area affected by construction or operation of the project. (x) An analysis of geohazards, including, but not limited to, slope instability, frost heave, soil settlement, erosion, earthquakes, mine subsidence, or other dynamic geologic, edaphic, and meteorological conditions along the proposed pipeline route and a demonstration that the proposed route avoids geohazards to the maximum extent possible. (xi) An environmental justice analysis that evaluates the impact, and any disproportionate impact, of the project pipeline on environmental justice communities, and any steps that will be taken to reduce or eliminate such impacts. (m) Proof that the applicant has financial assurance sufficient to cover estimated costs for emergency response, remedial action, and site restoration. The cost estimate shall be calculated in terms of reasonable actual remedial, construction, maintenance, and labor costs in the event of a worst-case leak that the department would bear if contracting to complete the actions. (n) Proof of insurance sufficient to cover wrongful death, bodily injuries, property damages, and public or private losses related to a release from the pipeline. The insurer must be rated at least an A- by an AM Best or equivalent credit rating agency. (3) The application shall be accompanied by payment of an application fee. The commission shall determine the amount of the application fee, which shall be sufficient to cover the cost of administration under this act, including conducting the contested case under subsection (4). (4) The commission's consideration of an application under this section shall be conducted as a contested case in accordance with chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. Sec. 13. (1) The commission may approve an application submitted under section 11 if the commission determines all of the following: (a) The applicant has demonstrated that the public need for the proposed pipeline outweighs the adverse impact on the public and the environment, and no feasible and prudent system-level alternatives exist to meet the need. (b) The proposed pipeline is designed and routed in a reasonable manner, and no feasible and prudent alternatives exist that would have fewer negative impacts on groundwater, surface water, drinking water, public health, and the environment. (c) The construction of the pipeline will meet or exceed current safety and engineering standards established and enforced by the U.S. Department of Transportation, Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration. (d) The applicant possesses the financial, managerial, legal, and technical qualifications necessary to safely construct and operate the proposed pipeline and sufficient financial assurance and insurance. (e) If the pipeline is a carbon dioxide pipeline, the pipeline and any pipeline pump or compressor station is not proposed to be located as provided in any of the following: (i) Within 1 mile of an occupied residential property or, if the occupied residential property is part of a development that includes 10 or more occupied residential properties, within 1.5 miles of the occupied residential property. (ii) Within 1 mile of a commercial property containing businesses with fewer than 10 employees. (iii) Within 1 mile of a livestock facility with 100 or more animals. (iv) Within 1/2 mile of a commercial or industrial structure or facility where 10 or more individuals are typically present for 8 hours or more during a business day. (v) Within 2 miles of a structure where 10 or more individuals with limited mobility are cared for, including, but not limited to, a nursing home or hospital. (vi) Within 2 miles of a structure with a permitted occupancy of 100 or more persons, including, but not limited to, a school, place of worship, shopping center, or entertainment facility. (vii) In a state park, local park, federal or state designated wilderness or natural area, or area of state land that is being conserved or managed for biological diversity, to support nongame fish and wildlife, or to protect ecologically significant features, plants, or animals. (2) For the purposes of subsection (1), distances from a carbon dioxide pipeline are measured from the center line of the carbon dioxide pipeline. Distances from a pump or compressor station are measured from the property line of the pump or compressor station. Sec. 15. (1) In addition to any other fee required under this act, by September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, the operator of a carbon dioxide pipeline shall pay a fee to the commission. (2) The amount of the fee is the product of the length of the pipeline in miles and an amount determined by the commission. That amount shall be uniform for all carbon dioxide pipelines and shall not be less than $50.00. At the end of 2027 and each year thereafter, the commission shall adjust the $50.00 figure by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index. (3) The commission shall forward fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.65116. (4) As used in this section, "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 822. (b)    Senate Bill No. 824. (c)    Senate Bill No. 825. (d)    Senate Bill No. 826. (e)    Senate Bill No. 827.